Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to Section 3 of Article V of the Oklahoma
Constitution, there is hereby ordered the following legislative
referendum which shall be filed with the Secretary of State and
addressed to the Governor of the state, who shall submit the same to
the people for their approval or rejection at the next General
Election.
Shall a constitutional convention be called pursuant to Section
2 of Article 24 of the Oklahoma Constitution?
SECTION 2. The Ballot Title for the proposed Question as set
forth in SECTION 1 of this measure shall be in the following form:
BALLOT TITLE
Legislative Referendum No. ____ State Question No. ____
Req. No. 12226 Page 1

THE GIST OF THE PROPOSITION IS AS FOLLOWS:
Pursuant to Section 3 of Article 5 of the Oklahoma Constitution,
and as required by Section 2 of Article 24 of the Oklahoma
Constitution, shall a convention to consider revisions to the
Oklahoma Constitution occur?
SHALL THE PROPOSAL BE APPROVED?
FOR THE PROPOSAL — YES _____________
AGAINST THE PROPOSAL — NO _____________
SECTION 3. The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives,
immediately after the passage of this act, shall prepare and file
one copy thereof, including the Ballot Title set forth in SECTION 2
hereof, with the Secretary of State and one copy with the Attorney
General.

60-1-12226 MAH 01/16/25









Req. No. 12226 Page 2